Massachusetts, session 194th, S118.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of chapter 118 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the fourth paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following new paragraph:- "Notwithstanding any general or special law to the
contrary, the payment standards for monthly benefits for the program not including the rental
allowance shall be increased effective July first of each year beginning with July 1, 2025 by 20
percent above the payment standard in effect in the previous fiscal year until the payment
standard for the household size equals 50 percent of the federal poverty level for the household
size; provided further, that once the payment standard for the household size equals 50 percent of
the federal poverty level for the household size, the payment standard shall be increased effective
July first of each year in order that the payment standard shall be no less than 50% of the poverty
of 2

level for the household size as determined by the federal Department of Health and Human
Services; provided further, that the need standard and the payment amounts shall be further
increased by the amount of a clothing allowance in the month for which it is paid and by the
rental allowance for households incurring a rent or mortgage expense and not residing in public
or subsidized housing."
SECTION 2. Section 1 of chapter 117A of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting after the first paragraph the following new paragraph:- "Notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the payment standards for monthly benefits for the program shall be
increased effective July first of each year beginning with July 1, 2025 by 20 percent above the
payment standard in effect in the previous fiscal year until the payment standard for the
household size equals 50 percent of the federal poverty level for the household size; provided
further, that once the payment standard for the household size equals 50 percent of the federal
poverty level for the household size, the payment standard shall be increased effective July first
of each year in order that the payment standard shall be no less than 50 percent of the poverty
level for the household size as determined by the federal Department of Health and Human
Services".
of 2